Utah statutes.
75-6-115.   Agency accounts.

Nothing in this chapter shall preclude a party to an account from adding the name of another person to such an account with the designation "agent." This agent shall have no present or future interest in the sums on deposit in such account, but the financial institution may honor requests for payment from such account by such agent, whether the principal be incapacitated or deceased at the time the payment is demanded, unless the financial institution has actual knowledge of such death or incapacity. Payments from such account by such financial institution at the request of such agent shall discharge such financial institution from all claims for amounts so paid.



Amended by Chapter 194, 1977 General Session

